Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1831
Right of action; abate; exception.

The rights to compensation created under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act are personal and shall not survive the death of a victim or dependent entitled to them, except that if the death occurs after an application for compensation has been filed with the committee the proceeding shall not abate, but may be continued by the legal representative of the decedent's estate.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 31;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 29.